Washington statutes.
RCW 18.51.062

Temporary managers—Department shall indemnify, defend, and hold harmless.

The department shall indemnify, defend, and hold harmless any temporary manager appointed and acting under RCW 18.51.060(7) against claims made against the temporary manager for any actions by the temporary manager or its agents that do not amount to intentional torts or criminal behavior.

[ 2005 c 375 s 1.]